Wisconsin, session 2025, AB669.
do enact as follows:AB669,11Section 1. 36.05 (6r) of the statutes is created to read:AB669,2,4236.05 (6r) (a) Subject to par. (b), “disadvantaged,” with respect to a student, 3means having experienced any unfavorable economic, familial, geographic, 4physical, or other personal hardship.AB669,2,95(b) The term “disadvantaged” may be further defined by the board by rule, but 6in doing so, the board may not permit, either directly or indirectly, the consideration 7of a student’s race, ethnicity, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, or religion 8or the consideration of a student’s identity as a member of a group without regard 9to individual qualities.AB669,210Section 2. 36.25 (14) of the statutes is amended to read:AB669,3,8136.25 (14) Graduate student financial aid. The board shall establish a 2grant program for minority and disadvantaged graduate students enrolled in the 3system. The board shall give preference in awarding grants under this subsection 4to residents of this state. The board may not make a grant under this subsection to 5a person whose name appears on the statewide support lien docket under s. 49.854 6(2) (b), unless the person provides to the board a payment agreement that has been 7approved by the county child support agency under s. 59.53 (5) and that is 8consistent with rules promulgated under s. 49.858 (2) (a).AB669,39Section 3. 36.25 (14m) (title) of the statutes is amended to read:AB669,3,111036.25 (14m) (title) Minority and disadvantaged Disadvantaged student 11programs.AB669,412Section 4. 36.25 (14m) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB669,3,151336.25 (14m) (a) The board shall fund programs for recruiting minority and 14disadvantaged students and for minority and disadvantaged students enrolled in 15the system.AB669,516Section 5. 36.25 (14m) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB669,3,191736.25 (14m) (b) By April 15, 1992, and annually thereafter, the board shall 18adopt a precollege, recruitment and retention plan for minority and disadvantaged 19students enrolled in the system.AB669,620Section 6. 36.25 (14m) (c) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:AB669,4,22136.25 (14m) (c) 2. All financial aid distributed to students, categorized by 22ethnic group, class level and dependency status. The report shall include 1information on financial need, percentage of need satisfied by loan, percentage of 2need satisfied by grant, and the percentage remaining unsatisfied.AB669,73Section 7. 36.34 (title) and (1) (title) and (a) of the statutes are repealed. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab669 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab669 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB669 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB669 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB669: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting